Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL SAFETY CENTER.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for eight school safety specialists at the Minnesota School Safety Center. This appropriation is in addition to any other appropriation for school safety specialists in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. This appropriation is onetime and available until expended. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end